Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-218
Testing centers; general purposes.

The object of such experimental testing stations shall be to study and demonstrate, both without and under irrigation, cropping systems suitable to the area, fertilization practices, methods of water distribution, the production of new crops, crop variety tests and such other matters as may be deemed best to develop the agricultural interests of the state.

Laws 1943, c. 5, § 3, p. 60;

R.S.1943, § 85-218.